test/src/gt-norm-yamls/A-3lex_keppis_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# â stems


  Adjective - keppis: # â-stems KEPPIS
    keppis+A+Attr: [keppâ, keppisis]
    keppis+A+Sg+Nom: keppis
    keppis+A+Sg+Gen: keppis
    keppis+A+Sg+Ill: keppisân
    keppis+A+Sg+Loc: keppisist
    keppis+A+Sg+Com: keppisáin
    keppis+A+Sg+Abe: keppisttáá
    keppis+A+Ess: keppisin
    keppis+A+Par: keppisid
    keppis+A+Pl+Nom: keppiseh
    keppis+A+Pl+Gen: keppisij
    keppis+A+Pl+Acc: keppisijd
    keppis+A+Pl+Ill: keppisáid
    keppis+A+Pl+Loc: keppisijn
    keppis+A+Pl+Com: [keppisijguin, keppisijgijn]
    keppis+A+Pl+Abe: keppisijttáá

    keppis+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: keppisub
    keppis+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Gen: keppisub
    keppis+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Ill: keppisuubon
    keppis+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Loc: keppisubboost
    keppis+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Com: keppisubboin
    keppis+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Abe: keppisubttáá
    keppis+A+Der/Comp+A+Ess: keppisubbon
    keppis+A+Der/Comp+A+Par: keppisubbod
    keppis+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Nom: keppisuboh
    keppis+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Gen: keppisuboi
    keppis+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: keppisuboid
    keppis+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Ill: keppisubboid
    keppis+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Loc: keppisuboin
    keppis+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Com: [keppisuboiguin, keppisuboigijn]
    keppis+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Abe: keppisuboittáá

    keppis+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: keppisumos
    keppis+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Gen: keppisumos
    keppis+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Ill: keppisumosân
    keppis+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Loc: keppisumosist
    keppis+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Com: keppisumosáin
    keppis+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Abe: keppisumosttáá
    keppis+A+Der/Superl+A+Ess: keppisumosin
    keppis+A+Der/Superl+A+Par: keppisumosid
    keppis+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Nom: keppisumoseh
    keppis+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Gen: keppisumosij
    keppis+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Acc: keppisumosijd
    keppis+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Ill: keppisumosáid
    keppis+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Loc: keppisumosijn
    keppis+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Com: [keppisumosijguin, keppisumosijgijn]
    keppis+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Abe: keppisumosijttáá
